Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1587.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Data broker” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646A.593.
(b) “Personally identifiable information” has the meaning given that term in ORS 432.005.
(c) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a public body may not disclose
personally identifiable information to a data broker unless the data broker first provides a
written attestation to the public body that the information will not be sold or otherwise
transferred to any entity that will use the information to enforce federal immigration law.
(b) If a public body reasonably believes that a data broker’s written attestation contains
material misrepresentations, falsehoods or omissions, the public body shall reject the written
attestation and shall decline to disclose personally identifiable information to the data bro-
ker.
(3) This section does not prohibit a public body from disclosing personally identifiable
information to a data broker if the disclosure is required under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 or
required by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or if the information is available
to the general public and is only disclosed under the same terms and conditions under which
the information is available to the general public.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1587 (SB 1587-B) Page 1

Passed by Senate February 24, 2026 Received by Governor:
Repassed by Senate March 4, 2026 ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
..................................................................................
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
Passed by House March 2, 2026
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House ..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1587 (SB 1587-B) Page 2